Hawaii statutes.
§271G-10 Applications for certificates of
public convenience and necessity. (a) Except as otherwise provided in
this section and in sections 271G-6 and 271G-12, no water carrier shall engage
in operations between points within the State unless the carrier holds a
certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the public utilities
commission authorizing the operation; provided that no new application shall be
required for any common carrier by water that is the holder of a certificate of
public convenience and necessity issued by the public utilities commission.

(b) Applications for certificates shall be
made in writing to the commission, be verified under oath, be presented in a
form, contain the information, and be accompanied by proof of service upon
interested parties as the commission shall, by rule, require.

(c) The commission shall not approve an
application for a certificate or otherwise grant authorization pursuant to an
application to operate as a water carrier under this chapter until the
commission has given notice and held public hearings conducted in accordance
with the procedures under section 271G‑23.5.

(d) The commission shall issue a certificate
to any qualified applicant, authorizing the whole or any part of the operations
proposed in the application only if the commission finds that:

(1) The applicant is fit, willing, and able properly
to perform the service proposed and to conform to this chapter and the
requirements and rules of the commission; and

(2) The proposed service, to the extent to be
authorized by the certificate, is or will be required by the present or future
public convenience and necessity.

(e) The commission shall not make a finding of
public convenience and necessity or issue an authorization, whether interim,
permanent, or otherwise, to operate as a water carrier without the following
specific findings supported by evidence in the record:

(1) Existing water carrier services are inadequate to
presently service the public or meet demonstrated and quantifiable future
demands for service;

(2) The proposed service is designed for and
necessary to meet demonstrated and quantifiable unmet public needs for present
water carrier service or demonstrated and quantifiable future demands for
service;

(3) The proposed service will provide demonstrated
and quantifiable benefits to the general public, business community, and the
economy of all islands that are entitled to notice under section 271G-23.5,
including demonstrated and quantifiable benefits with respect to reliability,
affordability, and security of the service line;

(4) The specific, identified benefits of the proposed
service outweigh its detrimental impact to the public's interest in maintaining
services, including:

(A) Economies of scale and scope of current
water carriers;

(B) Future capital costs of existing water
carriers;

(C) Ability of existing water carriers to
make necessary capital and resource investments;

(D) The financial health, stability, and
revenue stream of existing water carriers; and

(E) The likelihood that existing levels of
service will be maintained after the enactment of the proposed service; and

(5) If the commission's finding of public convenience
and necessity differs from the recommendation of the consumer advocate, specific
findings to address each ground for objection articulated by the consumer
advocate.

The commission shall not make a finding of public
convenience and necessity nor issue a certificate if the evidence in the record
indicates that the issuance of the certificate would diminish an existing water
carrier's ability to realize its allowed rate of return or if the certificate
would allow an applicant to serve only high-margin or high-profit ports or
lines of service that are currently served by an existing carrier.

(f) Any water carrier transporting passengers
under a certificate issued pursuant to this chapter may occasionally deviate
from the route over which it is authorized to operate under the certificate
pursuant to the rules of the commission.

(g) The commission shall not issue any
certificate that is designated as interim or temporary or that otherwise does
not conform to the requirements of this chapter except in response to an
emergency situation; provided that an emergency situation shall mean a state of
emergency or local state of emergency pursuant to chapter 127A. Any
certificate issued pursuant to this subsection shall expire upon the expiration
of the state of emergency or local state of emergency or an earlier date
determined by the commission in response to prevailing conditions. An
extension of a certificate granted under this subsection beyond the expiration
of the state of emergency or local state of emergency or date determined by the
commission shall be granted only subject to the notice, hearing, and findings
requirements of this chapter.

(h) The commission shall post a link on the
front page of the commission's website to a publicly accessible electronic
version of each application for a certificate pursuant to this section and to
each order of the commission regarding posted applications, including the
commission's final decision and order. Links posted under this subsection
shall include a short description of the document to which the link refers,
shall be active within twenty-four hours of the filing of an application or
issuance of an order, and shall remain active for at least thirty days from the
filing of the application or the issuance of the order or decision and order.
[L 1974, c 94, pt of §1; am L 2011, c 213, §3; am L 2014, c 111, §§10, 28]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next